District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1202.12

Supervision of adult education program.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1423, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 212
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-231, § 2(b), 46 DCR 487
June 12, 2007, D.C Law 17-9, § 303, 54 DCR 4102
1981 Ed., § 31-1520a.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-183 added this section.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 12-183 provided that this act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Adult Education Designation Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-449, September 18, 1998, 45 DCR 6667), and § 2 of the Adult Education Designation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-598, January 20, 1999, 45 DCR 1144).